Illinois, session 104th, SB1701.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Labor Relations Act is 5amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 315/3)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1603)7    Sec. 3. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise requires: 9    (a) "Board" means the Illinois Labor Relations Board or, 10with respect to a matter over which the jurisdiction of the 11Board is assigned to the State Panel or the Local Panel under 12Section 5, the panel having jurisdiction over the matter. 13    (b) "Collective bargaining" means bargaining over terms 14and conditions of employment, including hours, wages, and 15other conditions of employment, as detailed in Section 7 and 16which are not excluded by Section 4. 17    (c) "Confidential employee" means an employee who, in the 18regular course of his or her duties, assists and acts in a 19confidential capacity to persons who formulate, determine, and 20effectuate management policies with regard to labor relations 21or who, in the regular course of his or her duties, has 22authorized access to information relating to the effectuation 23or review of the employer's collective bargaining policies.   SB1701 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1Determinations of confidential employee status shall be based 2on actual employee job duties and not solely on written job 3descriptions.4    (d) "Craft employees" means skilled journeymen, crafts 5persons, and their apprentices and helpers. 6    (e) "Essential services employees" means those public 7employees performing functions so essential that the 8interruption or termination of the function will constitute a 9clear and present danger to the health and safety of the 10persons in the affected community. 11    (f) "Exclusive representative", except with respect to 12non-State fire fighters and paramedics employed by fire 13departments and fire protection districts, non-State peace 14officers, and peace officers in the Illinois State Police, 15means the labor organization that has been (i) designated by 16the Board as the representative of a majority of public 17employees in an appropriate bargaining unit in accordance with 18the procedures contained in this Act; (ii) historically 19recognized by the State of Illinois or any political 20subdivision of the State before July 1, 1984 (the effective 21date of this Act) as the exclusive representative of the 22employees in an appropriate bargaining unit; (iii) after July 231, 1984 (the effective date of this Act) recognized by an 24employer upon evidence, acceptable to the Board, that the 25labor organization has been designated as the exclusive 26representative by a majority of the employees in an   SB1701 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1appropriate bargaining unit; (iv) recognized as the exclusive 2representative of personal assistants under Executive Order 32003-8 prior to July 16, 2003 (the effective date of Public Act 493-204), and the organization shall be considered to be the 5exclusive representative of the personal assistants as defined 6in this Section; or (v) recognized as the exclusive 7representative of child and day care home providers, including 8licensed and license exempt providers, pursuant to an election 9held under Executive Order 2005-1 prior to January 1, 2006 10(the effective date of Public Act 94-320), and the 11organization shall be considered to be the exclusive 12representative of the child and day care home providers as 13defined in this Section. 14    With respect to non-State fire fighters and paramedics 15employed by fire departments and fire protection districts, 16non-State peace officers, and peace officers in the Illinois 17State Police, "exclusive representative" means the labor 18organization that has been (i) designated by the Board as the 19representative of a majority of peace officers or fire 20fighters in an appropriate bargaining unit in accordance with 21the procedures contained in this Act, (ii) historically 22recognized by the State of Illinois or any political 23subdivision of the State before January 1, 1986 (the effective 24date of this amendatory Act of 1985) as the exclusive 25representative by a majority of the peace officers or fire 26fighters in an appropriate bargaining unit, or (iii) after   SB1701 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1January 1, 1986 (the effective date of this amendatory Act of 21985) recognized by an employer upon evidence, acceptable to 3the Board, that the labor organization has been designated as 4the exclusive representative by a majority of the peace 5officers or fire fighters in an appropriate bargaining unit. 6    Where a historical pattern of representation exists for 7the workers of a water system that was owned by a public 8utility, as defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities 9Act, prior to becoming certified employees of a municipality 10or municipalities once the municipality or municipalities have 11acquired the water system as authorized in Section 11-124-5 of 12the Illinois Municipal Code, the Board shall find the labor 13organization that has historically represented the workers to 14be the exclusive representative under this Act, and shall find 15the unit represented by the exclusive representative to be the 16appropriate unit. 17    (g) "Fair share agreement" means an agreement between the 18employer and an employee organization under which all or any 19of the employees in a collective bargaining unit are required 20to pay their proportionate share of the costs of the 21collective bargaining process, contract administration, and 22pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other conditions 23of employment, but not to exceed the amount of dues uniformly 24required of members. The amount certified by the exclusive 25representative shall not include any fees for contributions 26related to the election or support of any candidate for   SB1701 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1political office. Nothing in this subsection (g) shall 2preclude an employee from making voluntary political 3contributions in conjunction with his or her fair share 4payment. 5    (g-1) "Fire fighter" means, for the purposes of this Act 6only, any person who has been or is hereafter appointed to a 7fire department or fire protection district or employed by a 8state university and sworn or commissioned to perform fire 9fighter duties or paramedic duties, including paramedics 10employed by a unit of local government, except that the 11following persons are not included: part-time fire fighters, 12auxiliary, reserve or voluntary fire fighters, including paid 13on-call fire fighters, clerks and dispatchers or other 14civilian employees of a fire department or fire protection 15district who are not routinely expected to perform fire 16fighter duties, or elected officials. 17    (g-2) "General Assembly of the State of Illinois" means 18the legislative branch of the government of the State of 19Illinois, as provided for under Article IV of the Constitution 20of the State of Illinois, and includes, but is not limited to, 21the House of Representatives, the Senate, the Speaker of the 22House of Representatives, the Minority Leader of the House of 23Representatives, the President of the Senate, the Minority 24Leader of the Senate, the Joint Committee on Legislative 25Support Services, and any legislative support services agency 26listed in the Legislative Commission Reorganization Act of   SB1701 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b11984. 2    (h) "Governing body" means, in the case of the State, the 3State Panel of the Illinois Labor Relations Board, the 4Director of the Department of Central Management Services, and 5the Director of the Department of Labor; the county board in 6the case of a county; the corporate authorities in the case of 7a municipality; and the appropriate body authorized to provide 8for expenditures of its funds in the case of any other unit of 9government. 10    (i) "Labor organization" means any organization in which 11public employees participate and that exists for the purpose, 12in whole or in part, of dealing with a public employer 13concerning wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of 14employment, including the settlement of grievances. 15    (i-5) "Legislative liaison" means a person who is an 16employee of a State agency, the Attorney General, the 17Secretary of State, the Comptroller, or the Treasurer, as the 18case may be, and whose job duties require the person to 19regularly communicate in the course of his or her employment 20with any official or staff of the General Assembly of the State 21of Illinois for the purpose of influencing any legislative 22action.23    (j) "Managerial employee" means an individual who is 24engaged predominantly in executive and management functions 25and is charged with the responsibility of directing the 26effectuation of management policies and practices.   SB1701 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1Determination of managerial employee status shall be based on 2actual employee job duties and not solely on written job 3descriptions. With respect only to State employees in 4positions under the jurisdiction of the Attorney General, 5Secretary of State, Comptroller, or Treasurer (i) that were 6certified in a bargaining unit on or after December 2, 2008, 7(ii) for which a petition is filed with the Illinois Public 8Labor Relations Board on or after April 5, 2013 (the effective 9date of Public Act 97-1172), or (iii) for which a petition is 10pending before the Illinois Public Labor Relations Board on 11that date, "managerial employee" means an individual who is 12engaged in executive and management functions or who is 13charged with the effectuation of management policies and 14practices or who represents management interests by taking or 15recommending discretionary actions that effectively control or 16implement policy. On and after the effective date of this 17amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, "managerial 18employee" includes the individual designated or appointed by a 19sheriff as the undersheriff or chief deputy to fill a vacancy 20under Section 3-3010 of the Counties Code and the individual 21serving as the superintendent of the jail under Section 3 of 22the County Jail Act, unless the sheriff and the relevant union 23have mutually agreed otherwise or the individual is already 24otherwise recognized under subsection (c) of Section 9 or any 25other provision of this Act. Nothing in this definition 26prohibits an individual from also meeting the definition of   SB1701 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1"supervisor" under subsection (r) of this Section. 2    (k) "Peace officer" means, for the purposes of this Act 3only, any persons who have been or are hereafter appointed to a 4police force, department, or agency and sworn or commissioned 5to perform police duties, except that the following persons 6are not included: part-time police officers, special police 7officers, auxiliary police as defined by Section 3.1-30-20 of 8the Illinois Municipal Code, night watchmen, "merchant 9police", court security officers as defined by Section 103-6012.1 of the Counties Code, temporary employees, traffic 11guards or wardens, civilian parking meter and parking 12facilities personnel or other individuals specially appointed 13to aid or direct traffic at or near schools or public functions 14or to aid in civil defense or disaster, parking enforcement 15employees who are not commissioned as peace officers and who 16are not armed and who are not routinely expected to effect 17arrests, parking lot attendants, clerks and dispatchers or 18other civilian employees of a police department who are not 19routinely expected to effect arrests, or elected officials. 20    (l) "Person" includes one or more individuals, labor 21organizations, public employees, associations, corporations, 22legal representatives, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, 23receivers, or the State of Illinois or any political 24subdivision of the State or governing body, but does not 25include the General Assembly of the State of Illinois or any 26individual employed by the General Assembly of the State of   SB1701 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1Illinois. 2    (m) "Professional employee" means any employee engaged in 3work predominantly intellectual and varied in character rather 4than routine mental, manual, mechanical or physical work; 5involving the consistent exercise of discretion and adjustment 6in its performance; of such a character that the output 7produced or the result accomplished cannot be standardized in 8relation to a given period of time; and requiring advanced 9knowledge in a field of science or learning customarily 10acquired by a prolonged course of specialized intellectual 11instruction and study in an institution of higher learning or 12a hospital, as distinguished from a general academic education 13or from apprenticeship or from training in the performance of 14routine mental, manual, or physical processes; or any employee 15who has completed the courses of specialized intellectual 16instruction and study prescribed in this subsection (m) and is 17performing related work under the supervision of a 18professional person to qualify to become a professional 19employee as defined in this subsection (m). 20    (n) "Public employee" or "employee", for the purposes of 21this Act, means any individual employed by a public employer, 22including (i) interns and residents at public hospitals, (ii) 23as of July 16, 2003 (the effective date of Public Act 93-204), 24but not before, personal assistants working under the Home 25Services Program under Section 3 of the Rehabilitation of 26Persons with Disabilities Act, subject to the limitations set   SB1701 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1forth in this Act and in the Rehabilitation of Persons with 2Disabilities Act, (iii) as of January 1, 2006 (the effective 3date of Public Act 94-320), but not before, child and day care 4home providers participating in the child care assistance 5program under Section 9A-11 of the Illinois Public Aid Code, 6subject to the limitations set forth in this Act and in Section 79A-11 of the Illinois Public Aid Code, (iv) as of January 29, 82013 (the effective date of Public Act 97-1158), but not 9before except as otherwise provided in this subsection (n), 10home care and home health workers who function as personal 11assistants and individual maintenance home health workers and 12who also work under the Home Services Program under Section 3 13of the Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act, no 14matter whether the State provides those services through 15direct fee-for-service arrangements, with the assistance of a 16managed care organization or other intermediary, or otherwise, 17(v) beginning on July 19, 2013 (the effective date of Public 18Act 98-100) and notwithstanding any other provision of this 19Act, any person employed by a public employer and who is 20classified as or who holds the employment title of Chief 21Stationary Engineer, Assistant Chief Stationary Engineer, 22Sewage Plant Operator, Water Plant Operator, Stationary 23Engineer, Plant Operating Engineer, and any other employee who 24holds the position of: Civil Engineer V, Civil Engineer VI, 25Civil Engineer VII, Technical Manager I, Technical Manager II, 26Technical Manager III, Technical Manager IV, Technical Manager   SB1701 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1V, Technical Manager VI, Realty Specialist III, Realty 2Specialist IV, Realty Specialist V, Technical Advisor I, 3Technical Advisor II, Technical Advisor III, Technical Advisor 4IV, or Technical Advisor V employed by the Department of 5Transportation who is in a position which is certified in a 6bargaining unit on or before July 19, 2013 (the effective date 7of Public Act 98-100), and (vi) beginning on July 19, 2013 (the 8effective date of Public Act 98-100) and notwithstanding any 9other provision of this Act, any mental health administrator 10in the Department of Corrections who is classified as or who 11holds the position of Public Service Administrator (Option 128K), any employee of the Office of the Inspector General in the 13Department of Human Services who is classified as or who holds 14the position of Public Service Administrator (Option 7), any 15Deputy of Intelligence in the Department of Corrections who is 16classified as or who holds the position of Public Service 17Administrator (Option 7), and any employee of the Illinois 18State Police who handles issues concerning the Illinois State 19Police Sex Offender Registry and who is classified as or holds 20the position of Public Service Administrator (Option 7), but 21excluding all of the following: employees of the General 22Assembly of the State of Illinois; elected officials; 23executive heads of a department; members of boards or 24commissions; the Executive Inspectors General; any special 25Executive Inspectors General; employees of each Office of an 26Executive Inspector General; commissioners and employees of   SB1701 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1the Executive Ethics Commission; the Auditor General's 2Inspector General; employees of the Office of the Auditor 3General's Inspector General; the Legislative Inspector 4General; any special Legislative Inspectors General; employees 5of the Office of the Legislative Inspector General; 6commissioners and employees of the Legislative Ethics 7Commission; employees of any agency, board or commission 8created by this Act; employees appointed to State positions of 9a temporary or emergency nature; all employees of school 10districts and higher education institutions except 11firefighters and peace officers employed by a state university 12and except peace officers employed by a school district in its 13own police department in existence on July 23, 2010 (the 14effective date of Public Act 96-1257); managerial employees; 15short-term employees; legislative liaisons; a person who is a 16State employee under the jurisdiction of the Office of the 17Attorney General who is licensed to practice law or whose 18position authorizes, either directly or indirectly, meaningful 19input into government decision-making on issues where there is 20room for principled disagreement on goals or their 21implementation; a person who is a State employee under the 22jurisdiction of the Office of the Comptroller who holds the 23position of Public Service Administrator or whose position is 24otherwise exempt under the Comptroller Merit Employment Code; 25a person who is a State employee under the jurisdiction of the 26Secretary of State who holds the position classification of   SB1701 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1Executive I or higher, whose position authorizes, either 2directly or indirectly, meaningful input into government 3decision-making on issues where there is room for principled 4disagreement on goals or their implementation, or who is 5otherwise exempt under the Secretary of State Merit Employment 6Code; employees in the Office of the Secretary of State who are 7completely exempt from jurisdiction B of the Secretary of 8State Merit Employment Code and who are in Rutan-exempt 9positions on or after April 5, 2013 (the effective date of 10Public Act 97-1172); a person who is a State employee under the 11jurisdiction of the Treasurer who holds a position that is 12exempt from the State Treasurer Employment Code; any employee 13of a State agency who (i) holds the title or position of, or 14exercises substantially similar duties as a legislative 15liaison, Agency General Counsel, Agency Chief of Staff, Agency 16Executive Director, Agency Deputy Director, Agency Chief 17Fiscal Officer, Agency Human Resources Director, Public 18Information Officer, or Chief Information Officer and (ii) was 19neither included in a bargaining unit nor subject to an active 20petition for certification in a bargaining unit; any employee 21of a State agency who (i) is in a position that is 22Rutan-exempt, as designated by the employer, and completely 23exempt from jurisdiction B of the Personnel Code and (ii) was 24neither included in a bargaining unit nor subject to an active 25petition for certification in a bargaining unit; any term 26appointed employee of a State agency pursuant to Section 8b.18   SB1701 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1or 8b.19 of the Personnel Code who was neither included in a 2bargaining unit nor subject to an active petition for 3certification in a bargaining unit; any employment position 4properly designated pursuant to Section 6.1 of this Act; 5confidential employees; independent contractors; and 6supervisors except as provided in this Act. 7    Home care and home health workers who function as personal 8assistants and individual maintenance home health workers and 9who also work under the Home Services Program under Section 3 10of the Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act shall 11not be considered public employees for any purposes not 12specifically provided for in Public Act 93-204 or Public Act 1397-1158, including, but not limited to, purposes of vicarious 14liability in tort and purposes of statutory retirement or 15health insurance benefits. Home care and home health workers 16who function as personal assistants and individual maintenance 17home health workers and who also work under the Home Services 18Program under Section 3 of the Rehabilitation of Persons with 19Disabilities Act shall not be covered by the State Employees 20Group Insurance Act of 1971. 21    Child and day care home providers shall not be considered 22public employees for any purposes not specifically provided 23for in Public Act 94-320, including, but not limited to, 24purposes of vicarious liability in tort and purposes of 25statutory retirement or health insurance benefits. Child and 26day care home providers shall not be covered by the State   SB1701 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971.2    Notwithstanding Section 9, subsection (c), or any other 3provisions of this Act, all peace officers above the rank of 4captain in municipalities with more than 1,000,000 inhabitants 5shall be excluded from this Act. 6    (o) Except as otherwise in subsection (o-5), "public 7employer" or "employer" means the State of Illinois; any 8political subdivision of the State, unit of local government 9or school district; authorities including departments, 10divisions, bureaus, boards, commissions, or other agencies of 11the foregoing entities; and any person acting within the scope 12of his or her authority, express or implied, on behalf of those 13entities in dealing with its employees. As of July 16, 2003 14(the effective date of Public Act 93-204), but not before, the 15State of Illinois shall be considered the employer of the 16personal assistants working under the Home Services Program 17under Section 3 of the Rehabilitation of Persons with 18Disabilities Act, subject to the limitations set forth in this 19Act and in the Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities 20Act. As of January 29, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 2197-1158), but not before except as otherwise provided in this 22subsection (o), the State shall be considered the employer of 23home care and home health workers who function as personal 24assistants and individual maintenance home health workers and 25who also work under the Home Services Program under Section 3 26of the Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act, no   SB1701 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1matter whether the State provides those services through 2direct fee-for-service arrangements, with the assistance of a 3managed care organization or other intermediary, or otherwise, 4but subject to the limitations set forth in this Act and the 5Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act. The State 6shall not be considered to be the employer of home care and 7home health workers who function as personal assistants and 8individual maintenance home health workers and who also work 9under the Home Services Program under Section 3 of the 10Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act, for any 11purposes not specifically provided for in Public Act 93-204 or 12Public Act 97-1158, including but not limited to, purposes of 13vicarious liability in tort and purposes of statutory 14retirement or health insurance benefits. Home care and home 15health workers who function as personal assistants and 16individual maintenance home health workers and who also work 17under the Home Services Program under Section 3 of the 18Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities Act shall not be 19covered by the State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971. As 20of January 1, 2006 (the effective date of Public Act 94-320), 21but not before, the State of Illinois shall be considered the 22employer of the day and child care home providers 23participating in the child care assistance program under 24Section 9A-11 of the Illinois Public Aid Code, subject to the 25limitations set forth in this Act and in Section 9A-11 of the 26Illinois Public Aid Code. The State shall not be considered to   SB1701 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1be the employer of child and day care home providers for any 2purposes not specifically provided for in Public Act 94-320, 3including, but not limited to, purposes of vicarious liability 4in tort and purposes of statutory retirement or health 5insurance benefits. Child and day care home providers shall 6not be covered by the State Employees Group Insurance Act of 71971.8    "Public employer" or "employer" as used in this Act, 9however, does not mean and shall not include the General 10Assembly of the State of Illinois, the Executive Ethics 11Commission, the Offices of the Executive Inspectors General, 12the Legislative Ethics Commission, the Office of the 13Legislative Inspector General, the Office of the Auditor 14General's Inspector General, the Office of the Governor, the 15Governor's Office of Management and Budget, the Illinois 16Finance Authority, the Office of the Lieutenant Governor, the 17State Board of Elections, and educational employers or 18employers as defined in the Illinois Educational Labor 19Relations Act, except with respect to a state university in 20its employment of firefighters and peace officers and except 21with respect to a school district in the employment of peace 22officers in its own police department in existence on July 23, 232010 (the effective date of Public Act 96-1257). County boards 24and county sheriffs shall be designated as joint or 25co-employers of county peace officers appointed under the 26authority of a county sheriff. Nothing in this subsection (o)   SB1701 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1shall be construed to prevent the State Panel or the Local 2Panel from determining that employers are joint or 3co-employers. 4    (o-5) With respect to wages, fringe benefits, hours, 5holidays, vacations, proficiency examinations, sick leave, and 6other conditions of employment, the public employer of public 7employees who are court reporters, as defined in the Court 8Reporters Act, shall be determined as follows: 9        (1) For court reporters employed by the Cook County 10    Judicial Circuit, the chief judge of the Cook County 11    Circuit Court is the public employer and employer 12    representative. 13        (2) For court reporters employed by the 12th, 18th, 14    19th, and, on and after December 4, 2006, the 22nd 15    judicial circuits, a group consisting of the chief judges 16    of those circuits, acting jointly by majority vote, is the 17    public employer and employer representative. 18        (3) For court reporters employed by all other judicial 19    circuits, a group consisting of the chief judges of those 20    circuits, acting jointly by majority vote, is the public 21    employer and employer representative. 22    (p) "Security employee" means an employee who is 23responsible for the supervision and control of inmates at 24correctional facilities. The term also includes other 25non-security employees in bargaining units having the majority 26of employees being responsible for the supervision and control   SB1701 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1of inmates at correctional facilities. 2    (q) "Short-term employee" means an employee who is 3employed for less than 2 consecutive calendar quarters during 4a calendar year and who does not have a reasonable assurance 5that he or she will be rehired by the same employer for the 6same service in a subsequent calendar year. 7    (q-5) "State agency" means an agency directly responsible 8to the Governor, as defined in Section 3.1 of the Executive 9Reorganization Implementation Act, and the Illinois Commerce 10Commission, the Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission, the 11Civil Service Commission, the Pollution Control Board, the 12Illinois Racing Board, and the Illinois State Police Merit 13Board. 14    (r) "Supervisor" is:15        (1) An employee whose principal work is substantially 16    different from that of his or her subordinates and who has 17    authority, in the interest of the employer, to hire, 18    transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, 19    direct, reward, or discipline employees, to adjust their 20    grievances, or to effectively recommend any of those 21    actions, if the exercise of that authority is not of a 22    merely routine or clerical nature, but requires the 23    consistent use of independent judgment. Except with 24    respect to police employment, the term "supervisor" 25    includes only those individuals who devote a preponderance 26    of their employment time to exercising that authority,   SB1701 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1    State supervisors notwithstanding. Determinations of 2    supervisor status shall be based on actual employee job 3    duties and not solely on written job descriptions. Nothing 4    in this definition prohibits an individual from also 5    meeting the definition of "managerial employee" under 6    subsection (j) of this Section. In addition, in 7    determining supervisory status in police employment, rank 8    shall not be determinative. The Board shall consider, as 9    evidence of bargaining unit inclusion or exclusion, the 10    common law enforcement policies and relationships between 11    police officer ranks and certification under applicable 12    civil service law, ordinances, personnel codes, or 13    Division 2.1 of Article 10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, 14    but these factors shall not be the sole or predominant 15    factors considered by the Board in determining police 16    supervisory status. 17        Notwithstanding the provisions of the preceding 18    paragraph, in determining supervisory status in fire 19    fighter employment, no fire fighter shall be excluded as a 20    supervisor who has established representation rights under 21    Section 9 of this Act. Further, in fire fighter units, 22    employees shall consist of fire fighters of the highest 23    rank of company officer and below. A company officer may 24    be responsible for multiple companies or apparatus on a 25    shift, multiple stations, or an entire shift. There may be 26    more than one company officer per shift. If a company   SB1701 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1    officer otherwise qualifies as a supervisor under the 2    preceding paragraph, however, he or she shall not be 3    included in the fire fighter unit. If there is no rank 4    between that of chief and the highest company officer, the 5    employer may designate a position on each shift as a Shift 6    Commander, and the persons occupying those positions shall 7    be supervisors. All other ranks above that of the highest 8    company officer shall be supervisors. 9        (2) With respect only to State employees in positions 10    under the jurisdiction of the Attorney General, Secretary 11    of State, Comptroller, or Treasurer (i) that were 12    certified in a bargaining unit on or after December 2, 13    2008, (ii) for which a petition is filed with the Illinois 14    Public Labor Relations Board on or after April 5, 2013 15    (the effective date of Public Act 97-1172), or (iii) for 16    which a petition is pending before the Illinois Public 17    Labor Relations Board on that date, an employee who 18    qualifies as a supervisor under (A) Section 152 of the 19    National Labor Relations Act and (B) orders of the 20    National Labor Relations Board interpreting that provision 21    or decisions of courts reviewing decisions of the National 22    Labor Relations Board. 23        (3) With respect to a police officer, other than a 24    police officer employed by the Illinois State Police, any 25    officer in a permanent rank for which the police officer 26    is appointed. For municipal police officers, "in a   SB1701 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1    permanent rank" shall mean those not subject to 2    promotional testing pursuant to Division 1 or Division 2.1 3    of the Illinois Municipal Code. The position or rank 4    immediately below that of Chief, whether occupied by a 5    person or persons in appointed positions or a tested rank 6    shall also be considered supervisors unless that rank is 7    that of patrol officer. An appointment of duties in which 8    the tested permanent rank does not change shall not be 9    considered the appointment of a supervisor under this 10    definition.11        (4) With respect to a police officer for the State 12    Police, any rank of Major or above.13    Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of 14subsection (r), "supervisor" does not include (1) a police 15officer excluded from the definition of "supervisor" by a 16collective bargaining agreement, (2) a police officer who is 17in a rank for which the police officer must complete a written 18test pursuant to Division 1 or Division 2.1 of the Illinois 19Municipal Code in order to be employed in that rank, (3) a 20police officer who is in a position or rank that has been 21voluntarily recognized as covered by a collective bargaining 22agreement by the employer, or (4) a police officer who is in a 23position or rank that has been historically covered by a 24collective bargaining agreement. However, these exclusions 25from the definition of "supervisor" only apply in this Act for 26the purposes of supervisory collective bargaining purposes   SB1701 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1only. Employees occupying supervisory bargaining ranks shall 2still be required to perform supervisory functions as outlined 3in paragraph (1) of subsection (r) and be held accountable for 4failure to perform supervisory functions. 5    (s)(1) "Unit" means a class of jobs or positions that are 6held by employees whose collective interests may suitably be 7represented by a labor organization for collective bargaining. 8Except with respect to non-State fire fighters and paramedics 9employed by fire departments and fire protection districts, 10non-State peace officers, and peace officers in the Illinois 11State Police, a bargaining unit determined by the Board shall 12not include both employees and supervisors, or supervisors 13only, except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection 14(s) and except for bargaining units in existence on July 1, 151984 (the effective date of this Act). With respect to 16non-State fire fighters and paramedics employed by fire 17departments and fire protection districts, non-State peace 18officers, and peace officers in the Illinois State Police, a 19bargaining unit determined by the Board shall not include both 20supervisors and nonsupervisors, or supervisors only, except as 21provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection (s) and except 22for bargaining units in existence on January 1, 1986 (the 23effective date of this amendatory Act of 1985). A bargaining 24unit determined by the Board to contain peace officers shall 25contain no employees other than peace officers unless 26otherwise agreed to by the employer and the labor organization   SB1701 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1or labor organizations involved. Notwithstanding any other 2provision of this Act, a bargaining unit, including a 3historical bargaining unit, containing sworn peace officers of 4the Department of Natural Resources (formerly designated the 5Department of Conservation) shall contain no employees other 6than such sworn peace officers upon the effective date of this 7amendatory Act of 1990 or upon the expiration date of any 8collective bargaining agreement in effect upon the effective 9date of this amendatory Act of 1990 covering both such sworn 10peace officers and other employees. 11    (2) Notwithstanding the exclusion of supervisors from 12bargaining units as provided in paragraph (1) of this 13subsection (s), a public employer may agree to permit its 14supervisory employees to form bargaining units and may bargain 15with those units. This Act shall apply if the public employer 16chooses to bargain under this subsection. 17    (3) Public employees who are court reporters, as defined 18in the Court Reporters Act, shall be divided into 3 units for 19collective bargaining purposes. One unit shall be court 20reporters employed by the Cook County Judicial Circuit; one 21unit shall be court reporters employed by the 12th, 18th, 2219th, and, on and after December 4, 2006, the 22nd judicial 23circuits; and one unit shall be court reporters employed by 24all other judicial circuits. 25    (t) "Active petition for certification in a bargaining 26unit" means a petition for certification filed with the Board   SB1701 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 10362 BDA 20437 b1under one of the following case numbers: S-RC-11-110; 2S-RC-11-098; S-UC-11-080; S-RC-11-086; S-RC-11-074; 3S-RC-11-076; S-RC-11-078; S-UC-11-052; S-UC-11-054; 4S-RC-11-062; S-RC-11-060; S-RC-11-042; S-RC-11-014; 5S-RC-11-016; S-RC-11-020; S-RC-11-030; S-RC-11-004; 6S-RC-10-244; S-RC-10-228; S-RC-10-222; S-RC-10-220; 7S-RC-10-214; S-RC-10-196; S-RC-10-194; S-RC-10-178; 8S-RC-10-176; S-RC-10-162; S-RC-10-156; S-RC-10-088; 9S-RC-10-074; S-RC-10-076; S-RC-10-078; S-RC-10-060; 10S-RC-10-070; S-RC-10-044; S-RC-10-038; S-RC-10-040; 11S-RC-10-042; S-RC-10-018; S-RC-10-024; S-RC-10-004; 12S-RC-10-006; S-RC-10-008; S-RC-10-010; S-RC-10-012; 13S-RC-09-202; S-RC-09-182; S-RC-09-180; S-RC-09-156; 14S-UC-09-196; S-UC-09-182; S-RC-08-130; S-RC-07-110; or 15S-RC-07-100. 16(Source: P.A. 102-151, eff. 7-23-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 17102-686, eff. 6-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 186-30-23.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 202026.